North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Part 6. Risk Management.

§ 131E-96.
Risk management programs.

Each hospital shall develop and maintain a risk management program which is designed to identify, analyze, evaluate, and manage risks of injury to patients, visitors, employees, and property through loss reduction and prevention techniques and quality assurance activities, as prescribed in rules promulgated by the Commission.

The Department shall not issue or renew a license under this Article unless the applicant is in compliance with this section.

History.

1987, c. 859, s. 17.